Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
operations ............................. $ 96,610,434
(2) Public university operations
and student support
for distribution to
public universities.................  $ 1,068,825,130
(3) Community College Support
Fund for distribution to
community colleges and
community college service
districts and school
districts................................. $ 858,973,475
(4) Oregon Opportunity Grant ... $ 231,671,200
(5) Oregon Promise grants ......... $ 47,286,508
(6) Oregon Tribal Student
Grant..................................... $ 26,027,051
(7) Oregon National Guard
tuition assistance .................. $ 5,521,477
(8) Oregon Health and Science
University education and
other programs ..................... $ 146,477,563
(9) Public university statewide
programs............................... $ 61,481,902
(10) Statewide public services ...... $ 196,559,462
(11) Debt service and related costs:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 1
(a) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities................. $ 311,924,293
(b) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ............... $ 49,620,182
(c) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon Health and Science
University ............................. $ 23,571,125
(d) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for implementing the Financial
Assistance Management Information
Systems project .................... $ 3,159,856
(e) Repayment of energy loans
made to Oregon public
universities by State
Department of Energy .......... $ 13,206,623
(f) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities .... $ 1,405,310
(g) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ............... $ 194,370
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$35,479,189 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,683,799 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon community colleges.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$48,060,583 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission to the Outdoor
School Education Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$18,852,926 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from lottery moneys
allocated to the Sports Lottery Account.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$94,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys distributed from the Education Stability Fund to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 2
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $11,090,554, to award grants to Portland State
University and Oregon’s  technical regional universities (Oregon Institute of Technology,
Southern Oregon  University, Eastern Oregon University and Western Oregon University) to
assist these institutions with long-term financial  sustainability and for the commission to
support direct admissions work in collaboration with the universities.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds and funds described in sections 12 to 16 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
related grants ....................... $ 106,412,317
(2) Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ........................... $ 3,803,366
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,438,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and  transferred to the commission for carrying out
the provisions of ORS 660.380 and 660.385.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$71,562,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  commission for carrying out
the provisions of ORS 660.400 and 660.405.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$145,801,717 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding  federal funds described in section 14 of
this 2025 Act, collected or received by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for
Higher Education Coordinating Commission programs and related grants.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$105,333 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from the moneys
received from  the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund and the Eastern Oregon
Timber Severance Tax Fund for the Community College Support Fund.
SECTION 13. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on  general obligation bonds issued for the
benefit of public universities  and Oregon Health and Science University and paid with re-
sources received from the public universities and  Oregon Health and Science University are
not limited.
SECTION 14. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for payments to individuals, organizations  or units of gov-
ernment from federal National Emergency Grants funds are not limited.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 3
SECTION 15. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on Build  America Bonds sold for the benefit
of public universities and community colleges are not limited.
SECTION 16. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission of moneys from the Tuition Protection Fund are not limited.
SECTION 17. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5525 (SB 5525-A) Page 4